Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.115

Director's duties as to refusal, revocation or suspension of licenses—Performance by assistants.

The director may deputize one or more of his or her assistants to perform his or her duties with reference to refusal, revocation or suspension of licenses, including the power to preside at hearings and to render decisions therein subject to the approval of the director.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5110; 1965 c 100 s 6.]